Utah statutes.
71-2-1.   Memorials by cities and towns.

The boards of city commissioners, city councils and town boards, respectively, may appropriate from any fund of the city or town available for general purposes such sums as they may deem expedient for the purpose of erecting or contributing to the erection of, a memorial to commemorate the achievements of soldiers, sailors and marines of the state of Utah in the Great World War, where such memorial is erected within their respective cities or towns. The city commissioners, city council or town board may, when authorized by the qualified electors of such city or town, issue general obligation bonds of such city or town and devote the proceeds of the same to the erection of such memorial.

